Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1842
Public Service Commission Regulation Fund; created; use; investment.

The Public Service Commission Regulation Fund is created. Transfers may be made from the Public Service Commission Regulation Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The commission shall remit all money received by or for it in payment of the fees or assessments imposed by the State Natural Gas Regulation Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 42.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.